District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0292.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA,
That this act may be cited as the "Let Students Attend Kindergarten Temporary
Amendment Act of 2025".
Sec. 2. Section 1 of Article II of an Act to provide for compulsory school
attendance, for the taking of a school census in the District of Columbia, and for other
purposes, approved February 4, 1925 (43 Stat. 806; D.C. Official Code§ 38-202 et seq.),
is amended by inserting a new subsection (b) to read as follows:

“(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, for School Years 2025-2026
and 2026-2027, a minor shall be exempt from the requirements of subsection (a) of this
section if:
“(1)(A) The minor was living in another state, and did not meet that state’s
age requirement to enroll in kindergarten at the date of that state’s enrollment deadline;
and
“(B) The minor moved to the District after the beginning of the
DCPS academic year; or
“(2)(A) The minor is younger than the age of 6; and
(B) The minor is enrolled in a public, private, or parochial five-
day-per-week pre-kindergarten program.”.
Sec. 3. Section 203 of the Student Promotion Act of 2013, effective February 22,
2014 (D.C. Law 20-84; D.C. Official Code § 38-781.02), is amended by adding new
subsections (e), (f), and (g) to read as follows:
“(e)(1) For School Years 2025-2026 and 2026-2027, any minor who has not
attended kindergarten, and who has not reached the age of 6 on or before May 31 shall be
permitted to be enrolled in kindergarten at the request of the minor’s parent or guardian.
“(2) DCPS shall provide written notice by July 31, 2025, or as soon as
possible, to the family or guardian of any child who has been told they must skip DCPS
kindergarten, or who has enrolled in DCPS as a first grader without having attended
kindergarten, that the child is eligible for kindergarten in School Year 2025-2026.
“(f) Any student completing their terminal year at a feeder school in School Year
2024-2025, may advance to the next middle or high school of that feeder pattern in


School Year 2025-2026, regardless of whether the student moved out of the boundary at
the current school.
“(g) Any student completing their terminal year at Hardy Middle School in
School Year 2024-2025, may choose whether they advance to MacArthur High School or
Jackson-Reed High School if they have a sibling attending Jackson-Reed High School for
School Year 2025-2026.”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as
the fiscal impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures
Act of 1975, approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-
301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or, in the event of
veto by the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of
congressional review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home
Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-
206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.